District of Columbia statutes.
28:4-211

When bank gives value for purposes of holder in due course.

For purposes of determining its status as a holder in due course, a bank has given value to the extent it has a security interest in an item, if the bank otherwise complies with the requirements of section 28:3-302 on what constitutes a holder in due course.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 700, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-249, § 2(e), 42 DCR 467
This section is referenced in § 28:5-102.
1981 Ed., § 28:4-211.
1973 Ed., § 28:4-209.

The section completes the thought of the previous section and makes clear that a security interest in an item is “value” for the purpose of determining the holder’s status as a holder in due course. The provision is in accord with the prior law (N.I.L. Section 27) and with Article 3 ( Section 3-303). The section does not prescribe a security interest under Section 4-210 as a test of “value” generally because the meaning of “value” under other Articles is adequately defined in Section 1-201.

Reason for 1990 Change [D.C. Law 10-249]

Modified to conform with current drafting practices; no intent to change substance.